Massachusetts, session 194th, H923.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 131 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking Section 1D in its entirety 
and inserting in place thereof the following section: - 
Section 1D. The board members shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to 
be reimbursed out of any funds available for the purpose, of their actual traveling and other 
expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their official duties, but such reimbursement 
shall not in any fiscal year exceed thirty thousand dollars for the total aggregate expenses of all 
the board members.